Wyoming, session 2026, SF0061.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 39-15-105(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xi) and 39-16-105(a) by creating a new paragraph
(xi) are amended to read:
39-15-105. Exemptions.
(a) The following sales or leases are exempt from the
excise tax imposed by this article:
(xi) Purchases of motor vehicles made from
immediate family members or transfers of motor vehicles
made to immediate family members, subject to all of the
following:
(A) As used in this paragraph, "immediate
family member" means a parent, child, spouse, sibling,
stepparent, stepchild, stepsibling, grandparent or
grandchild;
(B) The seller or donor of the motor
vehicle shall have paid sales tax or use tax as required by
law when the seller or donor purchased or received the
vehicle;
(C) The sale or gift of the motor vehicle
shall be made by the seller or donor to an immediate family
member to qualify for the exemption under this paragraph;
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0061
ENROLLED ACT NO. 59, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(D) A vehicle sold or gifted under this
paragraph shall be considered an exempt motor vehicle for
purposes of this chapter.
39-16-105. Exemptions.
(a) The following purchases or leases are exempt from
the excise tax imposed by this article:
(xi) Purchases of motor vehicles made from
immediate family members or transfers of motor vehicles
made to immediate family members, subject to all of the
following:
(A) As used in this paragraph, "immediate
family member" means a parent, child, spouse, sibling,
stepparent, stepchild, stepsibling, grandparent or
grandchild;
(B) The seller or donor of the motor
vehicle shall have paid sales tax or use tax as required by
law when the seller or donor purchased or received the
vehicle;
(C) The sale or gift of the motor vehicle
shall be made by the seller or donor to an immediate family
member to qualify for the exemption under this paragraph;
(D) A vehicle sold or gifted under this
paragraph shall be considered an exempt motor vehicle for
purposes of this chapter.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0061
ENROLLED ACT NO. 59, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3